Illinois, session 104th, SB213.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Government Advertising Spending Transparency Act. 6    Section 5. Findings. The General Assembly finds and 7declares:8    (a) Illinois benefits from robust local news services that 9provide trusted and essential information to the community 10that limits corruption, encourages citizen participation, 11helps combat misinformation, and mitigates community and 12individual alienation.13    (b) Local news in Illinois and throughout the country is 14struggling with newspaper advertising dropping 82% nationally 15since 2000, contributing to a 57% drop in the number of 16reporters at newspapers and thousands of closures.17    (c) Local news outlets are trusted sources of information 18for communities throughout Illinois and advertising spending 19with these outlets carries a substantial benefit for the 20effective dissemination of important government information to 21the communities it serves.22    (d) Government initiatives to increase spending on local 23news advertising have been manifestly successful in both   SB0213 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 05543 SPS 15573 b1supporting local news outlets and improving the information 2diet of communities in several major cities.3    (e) The public has a right to know where government is 4spending its advertising dollars and what proportion of those 5dollars are going to local news outlets in this State.  6    Section 15. Reporting requirements.7    (a) No later than October 1, 2026, and October 1 of each 8year thereafter, each State agency or department shall report 9the amount and distribution of its advertising spending to the 10General Assembly and post the report on its website. 11    (b) The annual report described in subsection (a) shall 12include:13        (1) the overall amount of advertising spending made by 14    the State agency or department;15        (2) the names of each advertising vendor that received 16    advertising contracts from the State agency or department 17    and the amount of those contracts;18        (3) the type of entity that received the advertising 19    spending, categorized by media type, including, but not 20    limited to, search platforms, national news outlets, 21    digital platforms, and local news outlets; and22        (4) the general subject matter of the advertising 23    placement, such as military recruitment, public health, or 24    job training.25    (c) If a contracted vendor places advertisements on behalf   SB0213 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 05543 SPS 15573 b1of a State agency or department, the State agency or 2department shall make a good faith effort to collect from the 3vendor sufficient information to comply with paragraph (3) of 4subsection (b).